public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi '-er/'-ar
# themeT1 + er/cE, themeT1 + ar/cE
# themeT4 + rò/cJL
# themeT8 + o/cEJKL
SFX c Y 157
SFX c ò à/FJLN ò
SFX c ò àe/F ò
SFX c ò è/JL ò
SFX c ò èmi/K ò
SFX c ò é/P ò
SFX c ò émoi/M ò
SFX c ò émome/G ò
SFX c ò émomene/G ò
SFX c ò ésimo/L ò
SFX c ò ésimoi/M ò
SFX c ò ésitu/O ò
SFX c ò éu/Q ò
SFX c ò í/P ò
SFX c ò ía/FJLN ò
SFX c ò íami/K ò
SFX c ò íatu/O ò
SFX c ò íe/FJL ò
SFX c ò íelo/B ò
SFX c ò íeƚo/B ò
SFX c ò íemi/K ò
SFX c ò ímoi/M ò
SFX c ò íu/Q ò
SFX c ò alo/B ò
SFX c ò aƚo/B ò
SFX c ò ami/K ò
SFX c ò atu/O ò
SFX c ò ave/FS ò
SFX c ò emo/EL ò
SFX c ò en/L ò
SFX c ò eni/M ò
SFX c ò ense ò
SFX c ò esi/P ò
SFX c ò esiu/Q ò
SFX c ò ié/P ò
SFX c ò iéu/Q ò
SFX c ò imo/EL ò
SFX c ò ion/EL ò
SFX c ò ioni/M ò
SFX c ò ionme/G ò
SFX c ò isen/L ò
SFX c ò iseni/M ò
SFX c ò isense ò
SFX c ò isié/P ò
SFX c ò isiéu/Q ò
SFX c ò ision/L ò
SFX c ò isioni/M ò
SFX c ò isionse ò
SFX c ò ison/L ò
SFX c ò isoni/M ò
SFX c ò isonse ò
SFX c ò on/EL ò
SFX c ò oni/M ò
SFX c ò onme/G ò
SFX c 0 e [ea]r
SFX c 0 me/G [ea]r
SFX c 0 mene/G [ea]r
SFX c 0 mi/K [ea]r
SFX c erò é/FP erò
SFX c erò éa/FJLP erò
SFX c erò éami/K erò
SFX c erò éau/Q erò
SFX c erò ée/JL erò
SFX c erò éelo/B erò
SFX c erò éeƚo/B erò
SFX c erò éemi/K erò
SFX c erò éi/NP erò
SFX c erò éimo/L erò
SFX c erò éimoi/M erò
SFX c erò éitu/O erò
SFX c erò émoi/M erò
SFX c erò émome/G erò
SFX c erò émomene/G erò
SFX c erò éndome/G erò
SFX c erò éndomene/G erò
SFX c erò éo/JL erò
SFX c erò éomi/K erò
SFX c erò érme/G erò
SFX c erò érmene/G erò
SFX c erò ésimo erò
SFX c erò éu/Q erò
SFX c erò évami/K erò
SFX c erò évau/Q erò
SFX c erò évelo/B erò
SFX c erò éveƚo/B erò
SFX c erò évemi/K erò
SFX c erò évimo/L erò
SFX c erò évimoi/M erò
SFX c erò évitu/O erò
SFX c erò évomi/K erò
SFX c erò í/FP erò
SFX c erò ímoi/M erò
SFX c erò íu/Q erò
SFX c erò ú [^u]erò
SFX c erò úo/B [^u]erò
SFX c erò ié/P erò
SFX c erò iéu/Q erò
SFX c erò iede/P erò
SFX c erò iege/P erò
SFX c erò ime/H erò
SFX c erò imo/EL erò
SFX c erò ion/EL erò
SFX c erò ioni/M erò
SFX c erò ionme/G erò
SFX c erò isen/L erò
SFX c erò iseni/M erò
SFX c erò isense erò
SFX c erò isié/P erò
SFX c erò isiede/P erò
SFX c erò isiege/P erò
SFX c erò ision/L erò
SFX c erò isioni/M erò
SFX c erò isionse erò
SFX c erò ison/L erò
SFX c erò isoni/M erò
SFX c erò isonse erò
SFX c erò iven/L erò
SFX c erò iveni/M erò
SFX c erò ivense erò
SFX c erò ivié/P erò
SFX c erò iviéu/Q erò
SFX c erò ivion/L erò
SFX c erò ivioni/M erò
SFX c erò ivionse erò
SFX c erò ivon/L erò
SFX c erò ivoni/M erò
SFX c erò ivonse erò
SFX c erò on/EL erò
SFX c erò oni/M erò
SFX c erò onme/G erò
SFX c erò udo/B [^u]erò
SFX c er ime/H er
SFX c er itu/O er
SFX c er omi/K er
SFX c o a/E o
SFX c o e/EFIJKL o
SFX c o i/EFN o
SFX c rò de rò
SFX c rò ge rò
SFX c rò me/H rò
SFX c rò mo/EL rò
SFX c rò n/L rò
SFX c rò ndo/E rò
SFX c rò ni/M rò
SFX c rò nse rò
SFX c rò nte/I rò
SFX c rò se/IT rò
SFX c rò sto/BI rò
SFX c rò va/FJLP rò
SFX c rò ve/JL rò
SFX c rò vi/NP rò
SFX c rò vo/JL rò
SFX c r lo/B er
SFX c r ƚo/B er
SFX c r mi/K er
SFX c uerò ú uerò
SFX c uerò úo/B uerò
SFX c uerò udo/B uerò

# vèrbi -<is>ír
# themeT1 + ir/AdE
SFX d Y 235
SFX d 0 me/G ir
SFX d ir é/F ir
SFX d ir éa/FJLP ir
SFX d ir éami/K ir
SFX d ir éau/Q ir
SFX d ir ée/JL ir
SFX d ir éelo/B ir
SFX d ir éeƚo/B ir
SFX d ir éemi/K ir
SFX d ir éi/NP ir
SFX d ir éimo/L ir
SFX d ir éimoi/M ir
SFX d ir éitu/O ir
SFX d ir éndome/G ir
SFX d ir éndomene/G ir
SFX d ir éo/JL ir
SFX d ir éomi/K ir
SFX d ir ésimo ir
SFX d ir évami/K ir
SFX d ir évau/Q ir
SFX d ir évelo/B ir
SFX d ir éveƚo/B ir
SFX d ir évemi/K ir
SFX d ir évimo/L ir
SFX d ir évimoi/M ir
SFX d ir évitu/O ir
SFX d ir évomi/K ir
SFX d ir í/FP ir
SFX d ir ía/FJLP ir
SFX d ir íami/K ir
SFX d ir íau/Q ir
SFX d ir íe/JL ir
SFX d ir íelo/B ir
SFX d ir íeƚo/B ir
SFX d ir íemi/K ir
SFX d ir íi/NP ir
SFX d ir íimo/L ir
SFX d ir íimoi/M ir
SFX d ir íitu/O ir
SFX d ir ímoi/M ir
SFX d ir índome/G ir
SFX d ir índomene/G ir
SFX d ir ío/JL ir
SFX d ir íomi/K ir
SFX d ir írmene/G ir
SFX d ir íselo/B ir
SFX d ir íseƚo/B ir
SFX d ir ísemi/K ir
SFX d ir ísime/H ir
SFX d ir ísimene/G ir
SFX d ir ísimo ir
SFX d ir ísitu/O ir
SFX d ir ísome/G ir
SFX d ir ísomene/G ir
SFX d ir ísomi/K ir
SFX d ir íu/Q ir
SFX d ir ívami/K ir
SFX d ir ívau/Q ir
SFX d ir ívelo/B ir
SFX d ir íveƚo/B ir
SFX d ir ívemi/K ir
SFX d ir ívimo/L ir
SFX d ir ívimoi/M ir
SFX d ir ívitu/O ir
SFX d ir ívomi/K ir
SFX d ir arà/FJLN ir
SFX d ir aràe/F ir
SFX d ir aràvelo/B ir
SFX d ir aràveƚo/B ir
SFX d ir aràvemi/K ir
SFX d ir arè/JL ir
SFX d ir arèmi/K ir
SFX d ir aré/P ir
SFX d ir arémoi/M ir
SFX d ir arémome/G ir
SFX d ir arémomene/G ir
SFX d ir arésimo/L ir
SFX d ir arésimoi/M ir
SFX d ir arésitu/O ir
SFX d ir aréu/Q ir
SFX d ir aría/FJLN ir
SFX d ir aríami/K ir
SFX d ir aríatu/O ir
SFX d ir aríe/FJL ir
SFX d ir aríelo/B ir
SFX d ir aríeƚo/B ir
SFX d ir aríemi/K ir
SFX d ir arísitu/O ir
SFX d ir arò/JL ir
SFX d ir aròmi/K ir
SFX d ir aralo/B ir
SFX d ir araƚo/B ir
SFX d ir arami/K ir
SFX d ir aratu/O ir
SFX d ir arave/FS ir
SFX d ir aremo/EL ir
SFX d ir aren/L ir
SFX d ir areni/M ir
SFX d ir arense ir
SFX d ir aresi/P ir
SFX d ir aresiu/Q ir
SFX d ir arié/P ir
SFX d ir ariéu/Q ir
SFX d ir arion/L ir
SFX d ir arioni/M ir
SFX d ir arionse ir
SFX d ir arisen/L ir
SFX d ir ariseni/M ir
SFX d ir arisense ir
SFX d ir arisié/P ir
SFX d ir arisiéu/Q ir
SFX d ir arisi/P ir
SFX d ir arision/L ir
SFX d ir arisioni/M ir
SFX d ir arisionse ir
SFX d ir arisiu/Q ir
SFX d ir arison/L ir
SFX d ir arisoni/M ir
SFX d ir arisonse ir
SFX d ir aron/L ir
SFX d ir aroni/M ir
SFX d ir aronse ir
SFX d ir en/L ir
SFX d ir endo/E ir
SFX d ir eni/M ir
SFX d ir ense ir
SFX d ir ente/I ir
SFX d ir erà/FJLN ir
SFX d ir eràe/F ir
SFX d ir eràvelo/B ir
SFX d ir eràveƚo/B ir
SFX d ir eràvemi/K ir
SFX d ir erè/JL ir
SFX d ir erèmi/K ir
SFX d ir eré/P ir
SFX d ir erémoi/M ir
SFX d ir erémome/G ir
SFX d ir erémomene/G ir
SFX d ir erésimo/L ir
SFX d ir erésimoi/M ir
SFX d ir erésitu/O ir
SFX d ir eréu/Q ir
SFX d ir ería/FJLN ir
SFX d ir eríami/K ir
SFX d ir eríatu/O ir
SFX d ir eríe/FJL ir
SFX d ir eríelo/B ir
SFX d ir eríeƚo/B ir
SFX d ir eríemi/K ir
SFX d ir erísitu/O ir
SFX d ir erò/JL ir
SFX d ir eròmi/K ir
SFX d ir eralo/B ir
SFX d ir eraƚo/B ir
SFX d ir erami/K ir
SFX d ir eratu/O ir
SFX d ir erave/FS ir
SFX d ir eremo/EL ir
SFX d ir eren/L ir
SFX d ir ereni/M ir
SFX d ir erense ir
SFX d ir eresi/P ir
SFX d ir eresiu/Q ir
SFX d ir erié/P ir
SFX d ir eriéu/Q ir
SFX d ir erion/L ir
SFX d ir erioni/M ir
SFX d ir erionse ir
SFX d ir erisen/L ir
SFX d ir eriseni/M ir
SFX d ir erisense ir
SFX d ir erisié/P ir
SFX d ir erisiéu/Q ir
SFX d ir erisi/P ir
SFX d ir erision/L ir
SFX d ir erisioni/M ir
SFX d ir erisionse ir
SFX d ir erisiu/Q ir
SFX d ir erison/L ir
SFX d ir erisoni/M ir
SFX d ir erisonse ir
SFX d ir eron/L ir
SFX d ir eroni/M ir
SFX d ir eronse ir
SFX d ir ese/IT ir
SFX d ir esto/BI ir
SFX d ir eva/FJLP ir
SFX d ir eve/JL ir
SFX d ir evi/NP ir
SFX d ir evo/JL ir
SFX d ir on/EL ir
SFX d ir oni/M ir
SFX d ir onme/G ir
SFX d r é/P ir
SFX d r éu/Q ir
SFX d r do/B ir
SFX d r ede/P ir
SFX d r ege/P ir
SFX d r me/H ir
SFX d r mo/EL ir
SFX d r on/EL [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d r oni/M [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d r onme/G [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d r sé/P ir
SFX d r séu/Q ir
SFX d r sa/E ir
SFX d r se/EFIJL ir
SFX d r sede/P ir
SFX d r sege/P ir
SFX d r sen/L ir
SFX d r seni/M ir
SFX d r sense ir
SFX d r sié ir
SFX d r sié/P ir
SFX d r si/EFN ir
SFX d r siede/P ir
SFX d r siege/P ir
SFX d r sion/L ir
SFX d r sioni/M ir
SFX d r sionse ir
SFX d r so/EJL ir
SFX d r son/L ir
SFX d r soni/M ir
SFX d r sonse ir
SFX d r ven/L ir
SFX d r veni/M ir
SFX d r vense ir
SFX d r vié/P ir
SFX d r viéu/Q ir
SFX d r vion/L ir
SFX d r vioni/M ir
SFX d r vionse ir
SFX d r von/L ir
SFX d r voni/M ir
SFX d r vonse ir
