public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
inasidir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inbaƚordir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inbastir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xbatarò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:xbàtar
biankir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xbóɉer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sobojir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
bortir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inbuƚir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ocèño/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ocèñer
oceñerò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:océñer
dir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dixdir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
maledixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:maledíxer
radolsir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sedúxar/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
konđonxo/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:konđónxer
elèđer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
eximarò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:exímar
falir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
defarir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
infiankir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reflèto/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reflèter
forbir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
fríđer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xgangir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ingramir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ingretolir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ingrisoƚir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
proibir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
exíɉer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inɉandolir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
skaderò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:skàder
inkalorir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
karpir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sokonbarò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:sokónbar
konpir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
konkórar/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inkòrxer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
rekoverxarò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:rekovèrxar
kuèrdo/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:kuèrder
deskuxir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
relèdo/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:relèder
lexierir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ƚúxar/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inmatir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
emeto/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:eméter
skometerò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:skométer
inmixarir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
morderò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:mòrder
inmutir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inuvoƚir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ónđer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
pasir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
respénder/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
despetrir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
piàxar/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
frapono/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:frapóner
suponerò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:supóner
dexinprímer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
spusoƚir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
korodarò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:koròdar
derokir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
irudenir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
desavir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
asarvir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
insisto/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:insíster
asòrbo/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:asòrber
spanir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
stitikir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
stranir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kostrénxer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
suɉarir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
tèmo/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:tèmer
sorintenderò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:sorinténder
intratèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inkonteñarò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:inkontéñar
tarir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
destòrđer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
estràer/coE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intuir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intarsédar/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sirkuir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
evàdar/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
invecir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
revendo/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:revénder
konveñerò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:konvèñer
devéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
rinveñarò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:rinvéñar
invilanir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
vínŧer/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
suxerir/AdE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
